Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB737.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5432YC (4) 91 sb/js H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 478.34 Electric transmission 1 emergency planning and coordination. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âElectric transmission lineâ means a high-voltage 4 electric transmission line with a capacity of two hundred 5 kilovolts or more that has been approved for construction on or 6 after July 1, 2022, for construction in a federally registered 7 planning authority transmission plan with costs allocated 8 regionally. 9 b. âElectric transmission line ownerâ means an individual or 10 entity that owns and maintains an electric transmission line. 11 c. âProclaimed disaster emergencyâ means a state of disaster 12 emergency proclaimed by the governor pursuant to section 29C.6. 13 2. a. An electric transmission line owner or electric 14 utility shall independently develop an emergency response plan 15 and submit the plan to the commission. The plan shall contain 16 at least all of the following information: 17 (1) The name, title, and twenty-four-hour contact 18 information of at least two designated individuals with the 19 authority to coordinate and direct the electric transmission 20 line ownerâs emergency response and restoration efforts. Each 21 electric transmission line owner shall notify the commission of 22 any change to this contact information within twenty-four hours 23 of the change occurring. 24 (2) Procedures for notifying state and local emergency 25 management agencies and neighboring utilities during a service 26 interruption. 27 (3) Strategies for the staging and mobilization of 28 personnel, equipment, and materials for expeditious 29 restoration. 30 (4) A summary of mutual aid arrangements with other entities 31 for supplemental repair crews and equipment. 32 (5) A methodology for prioritizing the restoration of 33 service to essential facilities, including hospitals, water 34 treatment plants, and public safety communications. 35 -1- LSB 5432YC (4) 91 sb/js 1/ 4 H.F. _____ b. An electric transmission line owner or electric 1 utility shall submit an initial emergency response plan to 2 the commission by December 31, 2026. Updated plans shall 3 be submitted annually thereafter, or within thirty days of 4 a material change, in the form and manner prescribed by the 5 commission. 6 c. An emergency response plan or information submitted 7 pursuant to this section shall be considered a confidential 8 record and shall be kept confidential, as provided in section 9 22.7, subsection 50. The records shall not be subject to 10 disclosure, except as necessary for the coordination of 11 emergency response and restoration efforts between authorized 12 state and utility personnel. 13 3. a. An electric transmission line owner or electric 14 utility shall notify the commission in the form and manner 15 prescribed by the commission when it is projected that an 16 outage may result in a loss of service for more than six hours, 17 provided the outage meets the criteria for a significant 18 interruption, as defined by commission rule. Notification 19 shall be made at the earliest possible time after the 20 determination and shall include all of the following: 21 (1) The general nature and cause of the interruption. 22 (2) The geographic area affected. 23 (3) A preliminary assessment of the extent of damage. 24 (4) The estimated time for restoration. 25 b. The notice required under paragraph âaâ shall be 26 supplemented as more complete or accurate information becomes 27 available, including updates to the estimated restoration time. 28 4. In the event of an actual or imminent proclaimed 29 disaster emergency, the electric transmission line owners shall 30 coordinate operational responses with each other and with 31 electric utilities, as necessary, for repair and restoration 32 to occur in an expeditious and orderly manner, and shall 33 provide the commission and the department of homeland security 34 and emergency management with information as requested to 35 -2- LSB 5432YC (4) 91 sb/js 2/ 4 H.F. _____ facilitate state-level emergency response decision making and 1 assistance. 2 5. An electric transmission line owner that violates any 3 provision of this section or any rule adopted pursuant to this 4 section is subject to a civil penalty, which may be levied 5 by the commission, of not more than one hundred dollars per 6 violation or one thousand dollars per day of a continuing 7 violation, whichever is greater. 8